Utah statutes.
75-4-207.   Ancillary and other local administrations -- Provisions governing.

In respect to a nonresident decedent, the provisions of Chapter 3 of this code govern proceedings, if any, in a court of this state for probate of the will, appointment, removal, supervision, and discharge of the local personal representative, and any other order concerning the estate; and the status, powers, duties, and liabilities of any local personal representative and the rights of claimants, purchasers, distributees, and others in regard to a local administration.

